Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 4.
Reconciliation of Two or More Orders.

§ 20-88.41. Determination of controlling child support order.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and only one tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of that tribunal controls and shall be so recognized.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter, and two or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of the Commonwealth or another state or foreign country with regard to the same obligor and same child, a tribunal of the Commonwealth having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules and by order shall determine which order controls and must be recognized:

If only one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that tribunal controls.

If more than one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, (i) an order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls, or (ii) if an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls.

If none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, a tribunal of the Commonwealth shall issue a child support order, which controls.

If two or more child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of the Commonwealth having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under subsection B. The request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or registration for modification pursuant to Articles 8 (§ 20-88.66 et seq.) and 9 (§ 20-88.74 et seq.) or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

A request to determine which is the controlling order shall be accompanied by a copy of every child support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

The tribunal that issued the controlling order under subsection A, B or C has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in § 20-88.39 or 20-88.40.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth that determines by order which is the controlling order under subdivision B 1 or B 2 or under subsection C or that issues a new controlling order under subdivision B 3 shall state in that order:

The basis upon which the tribunal made its determination;

The amount of prospective support, if any; and

The total amount of consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are credited as provided by § 20-88.43.

Within 30 days after issuance of an order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining that order shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal that had issued or registered an earlier order of child support. A party or support enforcement agency obtaining the order that fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the controlling order.

An order that has been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and interest, if any, made pursuant to this section shall be recognized in proceedings under this chapter.

(1994, c. 673; 1997, cc. 797, 897; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 substituted "Two or More" for "Multiple" in the article heading; substituted "shall" for "must" and "the" for "this" throughout the section, rewrote subsections B, C and F, added present subsection D, redesignated former subsections D through F as subsections E through G, substituted "has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in" for "is the tribunal that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in accordance with" in subsection E, in subsection G, substituted "which is" for "the identity of," "or support enforcement agency obtaining" for "who obtains," added subsection H and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "or foreign country" and "and must be recognized" in subsection B; deleted "and shall be so recognized" from the end of subdivision B 1; substituted "or (ii)" for "but (ii)" in subdivision B 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 20-88.42. Child support orders for two or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of two or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country, a tribunal of the Commonwealth shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of the Commonwealth.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 deleted "multiple" preceding "registrations" and "orders had been"; and substituted "the" for "this" in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "or a foreign country."

§ 20-88.43. Credit for payments.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of this or another state or a foreign country.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, added "or a foreign country" at the end.

§ 20-88.43:1. Application to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of the Commonwealth exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of the Commonwealth relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside the Commonwealth pursuant to § 20-88.59, communicate with a tribunal of another state outside the Commonwealth pursuant to § 20-88.60 and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside the Commonwealth pursuant to § 20-88.61. In all other respects, Articles 5 through 9 (§ 20-88.44 et seq.) do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of the Commonwealth.

(2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "outside the Commonwealth" wherever it appears; substituted "foreign support order" for "support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity"; deleted "another state" following "evidence from" and "of another state" following "a tribunal"; and substituted "Articles 5 through 9 (
§
20-88.44 et seq.)" for "Articles 5 (

§

20-88.44 et seq.) through 10 (

§

20-88.78) of this chapter."

§ 20-88.43:2. Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A court of the Commonwealth issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of the Commonwealth has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A court of the Commonwealth may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A court of the Commonwealth that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as:

An initiating court to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in the Commonwealth; or

A responding court to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

(2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727.)

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "or a foreign country" and "or foreign country" in subsection B.

Law review.

- For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).